Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [134.52] LIMITS ON ACCESS BY OFFICIALS ENGAGED IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin (a) An employee of a public library must not consent to a federal, state, or local official entering a public library for purposes of immigration enforcement unless the official provides the public library employee with a valid judicial warrant. The public library employee must request the federal, state, or local official to provide valid identification, and must grant entry to only the areas identified in the judicial warrant. new text end new text begin (b) A public library employee granting entry to a federal, state, or local official engaged in immigration enforcement must immediately notify the following: new text end new text begin (1) for a city library, the city mayor; new text end new text begin (2) for a county library or library within a federated regional public library system, the person designated by the county board; and new text end new text begin (3) for a library within a consolidated regional public library system, the person designated by the system board. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision does not prohibit entry by a federal, state, or local official administering a state or federally supported educational or library program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SEVERABILITY.new text end new text begin If application of this act to any person, entity, or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional and void, the remaining provisions of the law shall remain valid as applied to any other person, entity, or circumstance. new text end